Washington statutes.
RCW 43.71.060

Health benefit exchange account.

(1) The health benefit exchange account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may only be used to fund the operation of the exchange and identification, collection, and distribution of premium taxes collected under RCW 48.14.0201(5)(b) and 48.14.020(2).

(2) The following funds must be deposited in the account:

(a) Premium taxes collected under RCW 48.14.0201(5)(b) and 48.14.020(2);

(b) Assessments authorized under RCW 43.71.080; and

(c) Amounts transferred by the pool administrator as specified in the state omnibus appropriations act pursuant to RCW 48.41.090.

(3) All receipts from federal grants received may be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes consistent with the grants.

[ 2018 c 44 s 4; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 2; 2012 c 87 s 5; 2011 c 317 s 7.]